District of Columbia statutes.
29A-712

Repealed

Religious schools.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1283, ch. 854, § 598
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(6), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-512.
1981 Ed., § 29-912.
2001 Ed., § 29-712.